Washington statutes.
RCW 15.44.038

Quorum—Compensation—Travel expenses.

(1) A majority of the commission members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business and the performance of all duties of the commission.

(2) Each member shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.230. Each member or employee shall be reimbursed for actual travel expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter as defined by the commission in rule. Otherwise, if not defined in rule, reimbursement for travel expenses shall be at the rates allowed by RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 2002 c 313 s 92; 1984 c 287 s 15; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 15; 1975 1st ex.s. c 7 s 12; 1961 c 11 s 15.44.038. Prior: 1959 c 163 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.